src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpeduođalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/First:eahpe#duođal ETNOLOGALAS ;
eahpesosiálalaš+CmpN/First:eahpe#sosi^álal ETNOLOGALAS ;
eahpekristtalaš+CmpN/First:eahpe#kristtal ETNOLOGALAS ;
LEXICON Adjective
ruossalaš:ruossal ETNOLOGALAS ;
materiálalaš:materiálal ETNOLOGALAS ;
giellafágalaš:giella#fágal ETNOLOGALAS ;
meahccedoallofágalaš:meahcce#doallo#fágal ETNOLOGALAS ;
akkusatiivvahápmásaš:akkusatiivva#hápmás AHKASAS ;
aktalaš:aktal ETNOLOGALAS ;
alladávttálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:alla#dávttál AHKASAS ;
allegoriijalaš:allegoriijal ETNOLOGALAS ;
anatomalaš:anatomal ETNOLOGALAS ;
arkeologalaš+Use/Sub:arkeologál ETNOLOGALAS ;
árktalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:árktal AHKASAS ;
atelihkalaš:atelihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
autosemánttalaš:auto#semánttal ETNOLOGALAS ;
babylonalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:babylonal AHKASAS ;
valáštallanpolitihkalaš:valáštallan#politihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
dálkkádatpolitihkalaš:dálkkádat#politihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
benjaminlaš:benjaminl ETNOLOGALAS ;
birrajahkásaš:birra#jahkás AHKASAS ;
boazodoallofágalaš:boazo#doallo#fágal ETNOLOGALAS ;
brihttalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:brihttal AHKASAS ;
buorredohkálaš:buorre7#dohkál ETNOLOGALAS ;
buotguoskevaš:buot#guoskev AHKASAS ;
bákkolaš:bákkol ETNOLOGALAS ;
davvilaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:davvil AHKASAS ;
digitálalaš:digitálal AHKASAS ;
čiežadiibmosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čieža#diibmos AHKASAS ;
fitnodatekonomalaš:fitnodat#ekonomal ETNOLOGALAS ;
duhátjahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duhát#jahkás AHKASAS ;
duođaštuslaš:duođaštusl ETNOLOGALAS ;
dálvásaš:dálvás AHKASAS ;
njealjegielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njealje#gielal AHKASAS ;
riektefámolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:riekte#fámol ETNOLOGALAS ;
erenoamášpedagogalaš+v1+Use/NG:erenoamáš#pedagogal ETNOLOGALAS ;
earáivdnásaš:eará#ivdnás AHKASAS ;
earálágan+Use/Sub:eara#lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
earálágan+Use/Sub:eara#lágán LAGAN_LAGAS ;
ellipttalaš:ellipttal ETNOLOGALAS ;
espánnjalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:e^spánjal AHKASAS ;
etnalaš+Use/Sub:etnál ETNOLOGALAS ;
eváhkkolaš+Use/LexSub:eváhkkol AHKASAS ;
fitnofágalaš:fitno#fágal ETNOLOGALAS ;
friijahápmásaš:friija#hápmás AHKASAS ;
gaskaboddosaš:gaska#boddos AHKASAS ;
geahpedangelbbolaš:geahpe7dan#gelbbol ETNOLOGALAS ;
geardásaš:geardás AHKASAS ;
gielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gielal AHKASAS ;
giellamáhtolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giella#máhtol ETNOLOGALAS ;
golmmabeaivásaš:golmma#beaivás AHKASAS ;
čiežalotjahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čieža#lot#jahkás AHKASAS ;
grammatihkalaš:grammatihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
guoskevaš+Use/Sub:guoskiv AHKASAS ;
guvllolaš+Use/Sub:guovllul ETNOLOGALAS ;
gáhttenárvosaš:gáhtten#árvos AHKASAS ;
preassaetihkalaš:preassa#etihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
oarjemáilmmálaš:oarje#má#ilmmál ETNOLOGALAS ;
evangelalaš-luteralaš:evangelalaš-luteral ETNOLOGALAS ;
hárvelohkosaš:hárve#lohkos AHKASAS ;
indo-fijilaš:indo-fijil ETNOLOGALAS ;
iđalaš:iđal ETNOLOGALAS ;
juvdálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juvdál AHKASAS ;
klimáhtalaš:klimáhtal ETNOLOGALAS ;
kroahtalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:kroahtal AHKASAS ;
kulttorhistorjjálaš:kulttor#historjjál ETNOLOGALAS ;
luhteránalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luhteránal AHKASAS ;
lyralaš:lyral ETNOLOGALAS ;
beaivebálkkálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:beaive#bálkkál ETNOLOGALAS ;
guovttemannosaš:guovtte#mannos AHKASAS ;
medisiinnalaš:medisiinnal ETNOLOGALAS ;
miellasaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miellas AHKASAS ;
moattivahkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moatti#vahkkos AHKASAS ;
19-vahkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:19-vahkkos AHKASAS ;
35-vahkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:35-vahkkos AHKASAS ;
51-vahkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:51-vahkkos AHKASAS ;
morašmielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moraš#mielal ETNOLOGALAS ;
mágiijalaš:mágiijal ETNOLOGALAS ;
mánnosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mánnos AHKASAS ;
goabbatdássásaš:goabbat#dássás AHKASAS ;
sudássásaš:su#dássás AHKASAS ;
mandássásaš:man#dássás AHKASAS ;
16-geardásaš:16-geardás AHKASAS ;
5%0%0-geardásaš:5%0%0%-geardás AHKASAS ;
áidnageardásaš:áidna#geardás AHKASAS ;
máŋggajahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:máŋgga#jahkás AHKASAS ;
našuvnnalaš:našuvnnal ETNOLOGALAS ;
nuortariikalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nuorta#riikal AHKASAS ;
oassesivalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oasse7#sival ETNOLOGALAS ;
olgguldas:olgguld SISKKALDAS ;
olgoriikalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:olgo7#riikal AHKASAS ;
organisatuvrralaš+Use/Sub:organisatoral ETNOLOGALAS ;
iešguđegeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#guđege#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iešguđetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#guđet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
goabbatahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goabbat#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
ovttabeallásaš:ovtta#beallás AHKASAS ;
ovttaivnnálaš:ovtta#ivnnál ETNOLOGALAS ;
logijahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:logi#jahkás AHKASAS ;
ođastuspedagogalaš:ođastus#pedagogal ETNOLOGALAS ;
priváhttarievttálaš:priváhtta#rievttál ETNOLOGALAS ;
psykiátralaš:psyki^átral AHKASAS ;
pytagoralaš:pytagoral ETNOLOGALAS ;
riektevuoimmalaš:riekte#vuoimmal ETNOLOGALAS ;
rádjaguovlluguovdasaš:rádja#guovllu#guovdas AHKASAS ;
seammalágan+Use/NG+Use/Sub:seammá#lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
seammalágan+Use/NG+Use/Sub:seammá#lágán LAGAN_LAGAS ;
seammasullasaš+Use/Sub:seammá#sullás AHKASAS ;
seksuálalaš+Use/Sub:seksu^ál ETNOLOGALAS ;
servvodatlaš:servvodatl ETNOLOGALAS ;
siskkáldas+Use/Sub:siskkald SISKKALDAS ;
siskkildas:siskkild SISKKALDAS ;
siskkáldas:siskkáld SISKKALDAS ;
skohttalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skohttal AHKASAS ;
soajálaš:soajál ETNOLOGALAS ;
spásmmalaš:spásmmal ETNOLOGALAS ;
suomagielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suoma#gielal AHKASAS ;
syklihkalaš:syklihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
sápmelaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sápmel AHKASAS ;
sátnesiskkáldas:sátne#siskkáld SISKKALDAS ;
teknihkalaš:teknihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
ulbmildiđolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ulbmil#diđol ETNOLOGALAS ;
vepsalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vepsal AHKASAS ;
vieruiduvvanrievttálaš:vieruiduvvan#rievttál ETNOLOGALAS ;
vokálaidgaskasaš:vokálaid9#gaskas AHKASAS ;
suahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:su#ahkás AHKASAS ;
iežameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iehčameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehčame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežadeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežade#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežaskaahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežaska#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iehčametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehčamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežadetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežadet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežasetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežaset#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
njealjátluohkkálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njealját#luohkkál AHKASAS ;
guđatluohkálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guđat#luohkál AHKASAS ;
boahtteáiggediđolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:boahtte#áigge#diđol ETNOLOGALAS ;
álgoskandinávalaš:álgo7#skandinával AHKASAS ;
ávnnaslaš:ávnnasl ETNOLOGALAS ;
čuohtejahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čuohte#jahkás AHKASAS ; ! !
šaddodieđalaš:šaddo7#dieđal ETNOLOGALAS ;
9-mánnosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:9-mánnos AHKASAS ;
26-mánnosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:26-mánnos AHKASAS ;
42-mánnosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:42-mánnos AHKASAS ;
jiešguđegeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#guđege#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiešguđetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#guđet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiehčanahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiehčan#ahkás AHKASAS ;
jiežameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiehčameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiehčame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežadeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežade#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežaskaahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežaska#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiehčametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiehčamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežadetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežadet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežasetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežaset#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
japánalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:japánal AHKASAS ;
nuppáldas:nuppáld SISKKALDAS ;
mielalaš:mielal ETNOLOGALAS ;
